test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/N-IN-tohtosapoy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - tohtôsâpoy - ok : # -m inanimate noun, milk, with poss. element
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg: tohtôsâpoy
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl: tohtôsâpoya
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Loc: tohtôsâpôhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: cohcôsâpôsis
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: cohcôsâpôsisak
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: cohcôsâpôsisihk
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôhtôsâpôm
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôhtôsâpôm
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: otôhtôsâpôm
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: otôhtôsâpômiyiw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôhtôsâpôminân
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôhtôsâpôminaw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôhtôsâpômiwâw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: otôhtôsâpômiwâw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: otôhtôsâpômiyiw
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôhtôsâpôma
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôhtôsâpôma
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: otôhtôsâpôma
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: otôhtôsâpômiyiwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôhtôsâpôminâna
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôhtôsâpôminawa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôhtôsâpômiwâwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: otôhtôsâpômiwâwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: otôhtôsâpômiyiwa
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicohcôsâpômis
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicohcôsâpômis
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: ocohcôsâpômis
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: ocohcôsâpômisiyiw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicohcôsâpômisinân
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicohcôsâpômisinaw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicohcôsâpômisiwâw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: ocohcôsâpômisiwâw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: ocohcôsâpômisiyiw
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicohcôsâpômisa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicohcôsâpômisa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: ocohcôsâpômisa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: ocohcôsâpômisiyiwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicohcôsâpômisinâna
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicohcôsâpômisinawa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicohcôsâpômisiwâwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: ocohcôsâpômisiwâwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: ocohcôsâpômisiyiwa
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôhtôsâpômihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôhtôsâpômihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: otôhtôsâpômihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: otôhtôsâpômiyihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôhtôsâpôminâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôhtôsâpôminâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôhtôsâpômiwâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: otôhtôsâpômiwâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: otôhtôsâpômiyihk

     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicohcôsâpômisihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicohcôsâpômisihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocohcôsâpômisihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: ocohcôsâpômisiyihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicohcôsâpômisinâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicohcôsâpômisinâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicohcôsâpômisiwâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocohcôsâpômisiwâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocohcôsâpômisiyihk
